Illinois, session 104th, SB2262.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act is 5amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (115 ILCS 5/3)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1703)7    Sec. 3. Employee rights; exclusive representative rights. 8    (a) It shall be lawful for educational employees to 9organize, form, join, or assist in employee organizations or 10engage in lawful concerted activities for the purpose of 11collective bargaining or other mutual aid and protection or 12bargain collectively through representatives of their own free 13choice and, except as provided in Section 11, such employees 14shall also have the right to refrain from any or all such 15activities.16    (b) Representatives selected by educational employees in a 17unit appropriate for collective bargaining purposes shall be 18the exclusive representative of all the employees in such unit 19to bargain on wages, hours, terms and conditions of 20employment. However, any individual employee or a group of 21employees may at any time present grievances to their employer 22and have them adjusted without the intervention of the 23bargaining representative as long as the adjustment is not   SB2262- 2 -LRB104 12180 SPS 22282 b1inconsistent with the terms of a collective bargaining 2agreement then in effect, provided that the bargaining 3representative has been given an opportunity to be present at 4such adjustment.5    (c) Employers shall provide to exclusive representatives, 6including their agents and employees, reasonable access to and 7information about employees in the bargaining units they 8represent. This access shall at all times be conducted in a 9manner so as not to impede normal operations. Employers shall 10also provide the State labor organization with a copy of the 11information provided to the exclusive representatives. As used 12in this subsection, "State labor organization" means the 13statewide labor organization with which an exclusive 14representative is affiliated.15        (1) Access includes the following:16            (A) the right to meet with one or more employees on 17        the employer's premises during the work day to 18        investigate and discuss grievances and 19        workplace-related complaints without charge to pay or 20        leave time of employees or agents of the exclusive 21        representative;22            (B) the right to conduct worksite meetings during 23        lunch and other non-work breaks, and before and after 24        the workday, on the employer's premises to discuss 25        collective bargaining negotiations, the administration 26        of collective bargaining agreements, other matters   SB2262- 3 -LRB104 12180 SPS 22282 b1        related to the duties of the exclusive representative, 2        and internal matters involving the governance or 3        business of the exclusive representative, without 4        charge to pay or leave time of employees or agents of 5        the exclusive representative;6            (C) the right to meet with newly hired employees, 7        without charge to pay or leave time of the employees or 8        agents of the exclusive representative, on the 9        employer's premises or at a location mutually agreed 10        to by the employer and exclusive representative for up 11        to one hour either within the first two weeks of 12        employment in the bargaining unit or at a later date 13        and time if mutually agreed upon by the employer and 14        the exclusive representative; and15            (D) the right to use the facility mailboxes and 16        bulletin boards of the employer to communicate with 17        bargaining unit employees regarding collective 18        bargaining negotiations, the administration of the 19        collective bargaining agreements, the investigation of 20        grievances, other workplace-related complaints and 21        issues, and internal matters involving the governance 22        or business of the exclusive representative.23        Nothing in this Section shall prohibit an employer and 24    exclusive representative from agreeing in a collective 25    bargaining agreement to provide the exclusive 26    representative greater access to bargaining unit   SB2262- 4 -LRB104 12180 SPS 22282 b1    employees, including through the use of the employer's 2    email system.3        (2) Information about employees includes, but is not 4    limited to, the following:5            (A) within 10 calendar days from the beginning of 6        every school term and every 30 calendar days 7        thereafter in the school term, in an Excel file or 8        other editable digital file format agreed to by the 9        exclusive representative, the employee's name, job 10        title, worksite location, home address, work telephone 11        numbers, identification number if available, and any 12        home and personal cellular telephone numbers on file 13        with the employer, date of hire, work email address, 14        and any personal email address on file with the 15        employer; and16            (B) unless otherwise mutually agreed upon, within 17        10 calendar days from the date of hire of a bargaining 18        unit employee, in an electronic file or other format 19        agreed to by the exclusive representative, the 20        employee's name, job title, worksite location, home 21        address, work telephone numbers, and any home and 22        personal cellular telephone numbers on file with the 23        employer, date of hire, work email address, and any 24        personal email address on file with the employer.25    (d) No employer shall disclose the following information 26of any employee: (1) the employee's home address (including   SB2262- 5 -LRB104 12180 SPS 22282 b1ZIP code and county); (2) the employee's date of birth; (3) the 2employee's home and personal phone number; (4) the employee's 3personal email address; (5) any information personally 4identifying employee membership or membership status in a 5labor organization or other voluntary association affiliated 6with a labor organization or a labor federation (including 7whether employees are members of such organization, the 8identity of such organization, whether or not employees pay or 9authorize the payment of any dues of moneys to such 10organization, and the amounts of such dues or moneys); and (6) 11emails or other communications between a labor organization 12and its members.13    As soon as practicable after receiving a request for any 14information prohibited from disclosure under this subsection 15(d), excluding a request from the exclusive bargaining 16representative of the employee, the employer must provide a 17written copy of the request, or a written summary of any oral 18request, to the exclusive bargaining representative of the 19employee or, if no such representative exists, to the 20employee. The employer must also provide a copy of any 21response it has made within 5 business days of sending the 22response to any request.23    If an employer discloses information in violation of this 24subsection (d), an aggrieved employee of the employer or his 25or her exclusive bargaining representative may file an unfair 26labor practice charge with the Illinois Educational Labor   SB2262- 6 -LRB104 12180 SPS 22282 b1Relations Board pursuant to Section 14 of this Act or commence 2an action in the circuit court to enforce the provisions of 3this Act, including actions to compel compliance, if an 4employer willfully and wantonly discloses information in 5violation of this subsection. The circuit court for the county 6in which the complainant resides, in which the complainant is 7employed, or in which the employer is located shall have 8jurisdiction in this matter.9    This subsection does not apply to disclosures (i) required 10under the Freedom of Information Act, (ii) for purposes of 11conducting public operations or business, or (iii) to the 12exclusive representative.13(Source: P.A. 101-620, eff. 12-20-19.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.